Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
ARTICLE 7
INSURANCE PREMIUM FINANCING

5-7-101 to 5-7-103. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire article repealed, p. 30, § 15, effective March 9.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1977. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2001, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.